Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 293.265 is amended to read:
293.265. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection  and subsection (5) of this
section, it is the duty of the officer or other person or agent  collecting, receiving, in possession of,
or having the control of any state moneys or other funds, contributions or donations collected  or
received by, and to be expended  by or on behalf of the state under the approval or supervision of
any state agency, recognized by the laws of this state and  having the power to collect and disburse
state funds, to turn over all the moneys described in this section collected or received by or  on
account of the state agency, to the State Treasurer not later than  one business day after collection
or receipt of the moneys.
(b) The state agency , or other person or agent collecting state moneys or other  funds on
account of the state agency,  may  comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection by using a rea-
sonable, longer period for the transmittal  of particularly identified funds or categories of funds if
[it] the agency documents and maintains in its official files information that :
(A) A valid business reason exists for using a longer transmittal period [ and that];
(B) The period is no longer than necessary to satisfy that business reason ; and
(C) Any person  or agent collecting state moneys or other funds on account of the state
agency has complied with any applicable procedures,  principles, standards or requirements
for cash management prescribed by the State Treasurer under ORS 293.875 .
(c) Upon request of  the Division of Audits of the Secretary of State, the state agency shall
submit a copy of the documentation required under this subsection  to the division.
(2) The deposit by  or on behalf of the state under the approval or supervision of any state
agency of a check marked “paid in full,” “payment in full,”  “full payment of a claim” or words of
similar meaning does not establish an  accord and satisfaction that binds the state or prevents the
collection of the remaining amount owed upon the obligation  unless an officer or employee with
actual authority to settle claims  has agreed in writing to accept the check as full payment of a
disputed obligation.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, subject  to limits on amount
adopted pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, a state agency may return  any bank check or
money order received by the  state agency, whenever such bank check or money order is incomplete
or the report or record applied for is not available or releasable or the payment is  not owed. The
Enrolled House Bill 2779 (HB 2779-B) Page 1
state agency shall keep a record  of the check or money order returned, in the form prescribed by
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(4) After consultation with the State Treasurer, the department shall by rule  limit the return,
by a state agency, of  a bank check or money order under subsection (3) of this section to checks
or money orders of less than the amount specified in the rule.
(5) This section does not apply to moneys collected or received by a county  pursuant to
an agreement between the county and a state agency. The timing of a transmittal of  moneys
under such an agreement is governed by the terms of the agreement.
[(5)] (6) As used in this section, “state  agency” means any state officer, board, commission,
corporation, institution, department or other state organization whose costs are paid wholly or  in
part from funds held in the State Treasury.
SECTION 2.  ORS 295.013 is amended to read:
295.013. (1) When a custodian receives a pledge or release of  securities from a depository, and
after receiving the approval of the State Treasurer,  the custodian shall issue to the State
Treasurer[ , with a copy to the depository, ] a custodian’s receipt  that describes the securities.  The
custodian also shall issue a copy of the receipt to the depository.
(2) A custodian shall:
(a) Maintain an accurate inventory of  the securities of each depository described in the
custodian’s  receipts  that the custodian issues to the State Treasurer and adjust the inventory to
reflect [ withdrawals and substitutions ] pledges or releases  of securities that the custodian previ-
ously inventoried.
(b) Appraise the value of the securities added to and [ withdrawn] released from the depository’s
inventory and appraise the value of the depository’s entire inventory on  the last day of each month
and at such other times as the State Treasurer directs.
[(c) Provide  a monthly report to the State Treasurer that lists the securities each depository has
pledged and that sets forth the value of each security and of the entire inventory of securities  the de-
pository has pledged. ]
[(d) Notify a depository in writing within one business day after the custodian determines  that the
value of the securities the  custodian holds for the depository is less than the minimum collateral re-
quirement for the depository. ]
[(e) Notify the State Treasurer in writing within one business day after the custodian learns  that
a depository failed to increase the value of the depository’s securities  within the time required under
ORS 295.015 (3)(b). ]
[(f) Notify the State Treasurer in writing if a depository increases the value  of the depository’s
securities to an adequate amount after the depository receives notice under paragraph (d) of this sub-
section.]
[(g) Notify the State Treasurer within one business day after  the custodian determines that a bond
in the inventory of a depository no longer meets the  rating requirements described in ORS 295.001
(19)(c) or (d). ]
(c) Provide reports to the State Treasurer that describe the type and  value of each se-
curity pledged by each depository and any additional information required  by the State
Treasurer.
(3) The State Treasurer, by rule or through individual pledge agreements, may specify:
(a) Additional information that must be reported related to the securities pledged;
(b) The frequency with which reports required under this section must be provided; and
(c) Requirements for distribution of reports to depositories or other persons.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 295.015 is amended to read:
295.015. Except as provided in ORS 295.018:
(1)(a) A  depository throughout the period during which the depository possesses uninsured pub-
lic funds deposits shall maintain on deposit with the depository’s custodian,  at the depository’s own
expense, securities that have a value at least equal  to the depository’s minimum collateral require-
ment and as otherwise prescribed in ORS  295.001 to 295.108. The depository shall deposit the
Enrolled House Bill 2779 (HB 2779-B) Page 2
collateral with the depository’s custodian and the  depository and the custodian shall clearly mark
the collateral as security for public funds deposited in accordance with ORS 295.001 to 295.108.
(b) For purposes of this section, when pledged as collateral for public funds deposits,  loans de-
scribed in ORS 295.001 (19)(f) must be discounted to 75 percent of the unpaid  principal balance ow-
ing on the loan from time to  time, or to a lower value that the State Treasurer determines from time
to time.
(c) A bond anticipation note that is pledged as collateral for public funds  deposits and for which
there is no readily  determinable market value must be discounted to 75 percent of the unpaid prin-
cipal balance owing on the note from time to time,  or to a lower value that the State Treasurer
determines from time to time.
(2) A depository may deposit other eligible securities with the depository’s custodian and [ with-
draw] release from deposit securities that the depository pledged to secure  deposits of public funds
if the  remaining securities have a value not less than the depository’s minimum collateral require-
ment. The State Treasurer shall execute releases and surrender custodian’s  receipts that are ap-
propriate to effect [ substitutions and  withdrawals ] pledges and releases  of matured and excess
pledged securities.
(3) If a depository’s minimum collateral requirement increases because the depository ceases  to
be a well  capitalized depository as reflected in the depository’s last treasurer report, call report or
other public filing, or if the  depository receives notice from the depository’s custodian [ under ORS
295.013 (2)(d)] or from the State Treasurer:
(a) Within  three business days after the date on which the depository’s minimum collateral re-
quirement increases, the depository shall notify  the depository’s custodian[ , the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services ] and the State Treasurer in writing that the depository’s
minimum collateral requirement has increased, setting forth the depository’s new minimum collateral
requirement and the depository’s plan for increasing  the depository’s pledged collateral to the min-
imum collateral requirement; and
(b) Within five business days  after the date on which the depository’s minimum collateral re-
quirement increases,  or within a longer period approved by the State Treasurer [ and the director ]
in coordination with the Department of Consumer and Business Services , the depository shall,
in accordance with  the plan approved by the State Treasurer [ and the director ], tender to the
depository’s custodian additional  securities that have a value sufficient to increase the total value
of the depository’s securities pledged as collateral for public funds deposits to the  depository’s new
minimum collateral requirement.
(4) If a depository’s minimum collateral requirement decreases because the depository  becomes
a well capitalized depository, or because  the State Treasurer no longer requires the depository to
pledge additional collateral under ORS 295.018, the depository may:
(a) Notify the depository’s custodian and the State Treasurer in writing  that the depository’s
minimum collateral requirement has decreased, setting forth the depository’s new minimum collat-
eral requirement; and
(b) With  the written approval of the State Treasurer, [ withdraw] release from the depository’s
custodian securities that exceed the depository’s new minimum collateral requirement.
(5) The State Treasurer shall act upon requests for releases [ and withdrawals ] of securities un-
der subsections (2)  and (4)(b) of this section within three business days after receiving each request.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 295.018 is amended to read:
295.018. (1)(a) The State Treasurer may require a depository, during any  period when the de-
pository  possesses  uninsured public funds deposits, to maintain on deposit with the depository’s
custodians securities that have a value not less than 110 percent of the greater of:
(A) All uninsured public funds the depository holds; or
(B) The average of the balances of uninsured public funds the depository holds, as shown on  the
last two immediately preceding treasurer reports.
(b) In consultation with the  Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, the
State Treasurer may permit a depository to increase the depository’s collateral as required under
Enrolled House Bill 2779 (HB 2779-B) Page 3
paragraph (a) of this subsection over a period of  time the State Treasurer specifies or may require
a depository to increase the depository’s collateral to  an amount that is less than the amount
specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) The State Treasurer shall  order an increase in collateral under subsection (1) of this section
if the director so advises. If the depository is a national bank, a federally chartered savings bank,
a savings and loan  association or a federal credit union, in giving advice to the State Treasurer the
director may rely exclusively on information that the federal  regulatory agencies and the bank,
savings bank, association or federal credit union provide to the  director on forms the director pre-
scribes. As a condition of being analyzed and reviewed by the director, a national  bank, a federally
chartered  savings  bank, a savings and loan association or a federal credit union shall agree and
consent to provide the director with accurate, pertinent and timely information.
(3) If the State Treasurer orders a  depository to increase the depository’s collateral under sub-
section (1) of this section, the State Treasurer shall give  notice of the order to the director and the
custodian of the depository within one business day after issuing the order.
(4) The director’s failure to inform  the State Treasurer of the condition of any depository does
not give a public depositor any right or impose liability on the director. The  State Treasurer is not
liable to a public depositor or  to a depository for increasing or not increasing the collateral re-
quirement as authorized in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) A depository that the State Treasurer notifies of the increased collateral requirement shall:
(a) Within  three business days after receiving the notice, submit to the State Treasurer [ and the
director] the depository’s plan to increase the depository’s  collateral to the level the State Treasurer
requires under subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Within five business days after receiving  approval of the plan the depository submitted under
paragraph (a) of  this subsection, or within a longer period approved by the State Treasurer [ and the
director] in coordination with the Department of Consumer and Business Services , increase the
depository’s collateral to the level the State Treasurer requires under subsection (1) of  this section
[and notify the State Treasurer and the director that the depository has complied  by supplying copies
of the custodian’s receipts for, or statement of activity showing, the increased collateral ].
(6)(a) If the [ State Treasurer does not receive the notice required in subsection (5)(b)  of this
section] depository does not increase the depository’s collateral to the level the  State Treas-
urer requires under subsection (1) of this section  within the applicable period under  subsection
(5)(b) of this section, the State Treasurer shall immediately send, to each public official who has
notified the State Treasurer that the public official has public funds on deposit  in that depository,
notice that the depository has failed to comply.
(b) If, after  giving notice as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the State Treasurer
receives notice that the depository has complied with the increased  collateral requirements, the
State Treasurer shall notify each public  official that the State Treasurer notified under paragraph
(a) of this subsection that the depository has complied.
(7) A depository that does not comply with subsection (5)  of this section may not accept addi-
tional uninsured public funds deposits.
(8) Records the State Treasurer receives or compiles that  contain the collateralization require-
ment for a depository and the amount of collateral a custodian holds are exempt  from public dis-
closure unless the public interest requires disclosure in the particular instance.
(9) The  State Treasurer may require a depository that must increase the depository’s collateral
under subsection (5) of this section to file the reports required under ORS 295.061 (3).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 295.031 is amended to read:
295.031. (1) Within three business  days after the State Treasurer [ receives notice from a custodian
pursuant to  ORS 295.013 (2)(e), ] determines that a depository has failed to increase the value
of the depository’s securities within the time required  under ORS 295.015 (3)(b) or  receives
information from the Director of the Department  of Consumer and Business Services or other
sources  under  ORS 295.071 or 295.073, or otherwise receives information that indicates that a de-
pository has failed to  pledge adequate collateral with the depository’s custodian, the State Treasurer
Enrolled House Bill 2779 (HB 2779-B) Page 4
shall send written notice of the failure to each public  official who has uninsured public funds on
deposit in the depository [ that is the subject of the notice from  the custodian or of the information the
State Treasurer received ].
(2) Within  five business days after the State Treasurer receives [ notice] a receipt from a custo-
dian pursuant to ORS 295.013 [ (2)(f)] (1) that indicates that a depository has pledged adequate
collateral with the depository’s custodian, the State Treasurer shall send written notice to  each
public official who was  notified under subsection (1) of this section stating that the depository has
adequate collateral.
SECTION 6.  ORS 295.048 is amended to read:
295.048. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 295.046, a depository  may not permit the aggregate of
uninsured public funds deposits on deposit with the depository from all public officials to exceed  at
any time the lesser of:
(a) 100 percent of the value of the depository’s net worth, if the depository is an undercapital-
ized depository;
(b) 150 percent of the value of the depository’s net worth, if the depository is an adequately
capitalized depository;
(c) 200 percent of the value of the depository’s net worth, if the  depository is a well capitalized
depository;
(d) For a  bank depository, 30 percent of the total aggregate uninsured public funds deposits of
all public officials in all bank depositories as reported in the most  recent notice the bank depository
received from the State Treasurer; or
(e) For a credit union depository, 30  percent of the total aggregate uninsured public funds de-
posits of all public officials in all credit union depositories as reported in the most  recent notice the
credit union depository received from the State Treasurer.
(2) The State Treasurer shall notify each bank  depository or credit union depository [ and], or
the depository’s custodian if required by an individual pledge agreement or by rule,  of the total
aggregate uninsured public funds deposits of all public officials in all  bank depositories or credit
union depositories, as appropriate, based on the most recently submitted treasurer reports.  The
State Treasurer  shall give the notification required by this subsection by the last day of the month
in which the depositories are required to submit a treasurer report.
(3) If a depository’s aggregate of uninsured public funds deposits exceeds the amount  set forth
in subsection (1)  of this section, the depository shall, within three business days after receiving no-
tice from the State Treasurer, cease accepting deposits of uninsured public funds.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this section:
(a) A depository may accept and hold uninsured public funds deposits in excess of the limits
specified in subsection (1)  of this section if the State Treasurer, upon good cause shown, approves
the depository’s request to hold uninsured public funds in  excess of the limits specified in subsection
(1) of this section for a period  not exceeding 90 days and eligible securities are deposited with the
depository’s custodian as collateral in an amount at least equal to the amount of  the uninsured
public funds deposits that exceeds the limits specified in subsection (1) of this section.  Upon the
expiration of the 90-day period, if the depository does not comply with the  limits specified in sub-
section (1) of this section, the depository shall, within three business  days after receiving notice
from the State Treasurer, cease accepting deposits of public funds.
(b) The limits specified in subsection (1) of this section do not apply  to public funds deposits a
depository holds in  a certificate of deposit or time deposit under ORS 295.004 (1) or public funds that
an Oregon depository arranges to deposit into an insured deposit account under ORS 295.004 (2).
(c) A well capitalized depository or an adequately capitalized depository may accept and hold
uninsured public funds  deposits that exceed the limit specified in subsection (1)(d) or (e) of this
section if eligible securities are deposited with the depository’s custodian as collateral  in an amount
at least equal to the amount of the uninsured public funds deposits that exceed  the limit specified
in subsection (1)(d) or (e) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2779 (HB 2779-B) Page 5
(5) If the State Treasurer notifies a depository that it must cease  accepting deposits of public
funds under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, the State Treasurer may  also notify public officials
who have deposited public funds in  the depository that within 15 business days after the public of-
ficial receives the notice from the State Treasurer, the public official must  withdraw from the de-
pository to which the notice applies all public funds deposits that exceed the  limit specified in
subsection (1)(d) or (e) of  this section. A public official who is notified by the State Treasurer under
this subsection must begin to withdraw funds as  specified in the notice. Except as required by any
applicable law or regulation, a depository may not impose an early withdrawal penalty or  a forfei-
ture of interest with respect to a withdrawal made pursuant to this subsection.
SECTION 7.  ORS 295.061 is amended to read:
295.061. (1) On or before the date on  which each treasurer report is due, each depository shall
file the depository’s treasurer report with the [ depository’s custodian and with the ] State Treasurer
using systems and processes prescribed by the State Treasurer in individual pledge agree-
ments or by rule .
(2) Each depository that files reports with  the State Treasurer under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion shall notify the State Treasurer in writing or  by electronic means within three business days
of:
(a) The  date on which the depository’s net worth is reduced by an amount greater than 10 per-
cent of the amount  shown as the depository’s net worth on the most recent report the depository
submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The date on which the depository ceases to  be well capitalized and becomes adequately
capitalized or undercapitalized, or ceases to  be adequately capitalized and becomes undercapitalized.
(3) An adequately capitalized depository or  an undercapitalized depository shall report to the
[depository’s custodian and to the ] State Treasurer at least once each week the actual amount of
uninsured public  funds deposits the depository holds.  The depository shall report using systems
and processes prescribed by the State Treasurer in individual pledge agreements or by rule.
(4)(a) If a depository fails to file the reports or provide the notices  required under this section
or fails to file the notices or reports  required under ORS 295.018, the State Treasurer shall send a
notice to each public official who has uninsured public funds on deposit in the depository  that the
depository failed to comply.
(b) If, after giving notice under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the State  Treasurer receives
notice that the depository has filed the required reports or provided the required notices, the  State
Treasurer may notify  each public official who was notified under paragraph (a) of this subsection
that the depository has complied.
(5) If  a depository fails to comply with this section, the depository shall, within three business
days after receiving notice from the State Treasurer, cease  accepting deposits of uninsured public
funds.
SECTION 8.
(1) The State Treasurer  shall convene a work group to study and develop a
report on provisions of state law relating to depositories of public funds.
(2) Members of the work group shall be appointed by  the State Treasurer and must in-
clude:
(a) Representatives of the office of the State Treasurer;
(b) Representatives of state agencies that have a variety of banking and deposit  needs,
including a state agency with  frequent, high-value deposits and a state agency with remote
locations and infrequent or low-value deposits;
(c) Representatives of public officials, as defined in ORS 295.001;
(d) Representatives of depositories, as defined in ORS 295.001; and
(e) Other interested stakeholders, as the State Treasurer determines is appropriate.
(3) The work group shall review ORS 295.001 to 295.108 and other provisions  of state law
relating to depositories of public funds and consider changes to state law to improve  proc-
esses for transfer and deposit of public funds or to better protect public funds against loss.
Enrolled House Bill 2779 (HB 2779-B) Page 6
(4) The State Treasurer shall convene the work  group as soon as practicable after the
effective date of this 2017 Act. The State  Treasurer shall provide facilities and administrative
support for meetings of the work group.
(5) Before February 1, 2019, the State Treasurer shall submit a  report on the activities
and findings of the work group and any proposed legislation or other recommendations to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to revenue.
SECTION 9. Section 8 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2020.
SECTION 10. The chairperson of the  Oregon Investment Council, after consultation with
the State Treasurer, shall  prescribe continuing education requirements for members of the
council. Such continuing education requirements must relate to fiduciary duties,  best prac-
tices or both.
SECTION 11. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House May 9, 2017
Repassed by House June 19, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 14, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2779 (HB 2779-B) Page 7